Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-313
Failure to mail copy of published notice; assessment invalidated.

The failure of any county clerk, city clerk, clerk of a political subdivision, except any city of the metropolitan class, or any other person upon whom the duty is imposed by law to mail a copy of a published notice as provided in sections 13-310 to 13-314 shall invalidate the assessment against the property involved while permitting all other assessments and procedures to be lawful.

Laws 1973, LB 344, § 4;

Laws 1974, LB 655, § 4;

R.S.1943, (1983), § 18-1219.